Maryland, session 2025, HB0641.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
7–107.1.
(A) (1) THE GOVERNOR, AFTER CONSULTATION WITH THE SECRETARY
OF TRANSPORTATION, SHALL SUBMIT TO THE BOARD OF PUBLIC WORKS AND THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY WITH THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL A PROPOSAL FOR A STATE
PROPERTY TAX ON ASSESSABLE PROPERTY FOR THE NEXT TAXABLE YEAR TO
SUPPORT TRANSPORTATION PROJECTS AND PROGRAMS.
(2) THE PROPOSAL UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION IS
IN ADDITION TO THE RATES OF STATE TAX CERTIFIED BY THE BOARD OF PUBLIC
WORKS UNDER § 8–134 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(3) THE PROPOSAL UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION:
(I) SHALL INCLUDE:
1. A REVENUE ESTIMATE, ITEMIZED BY COUNTY, FOR
THE PROPOSED STATE PROPERTY TAX; AND
2. INFORMATION ON THE CRITERIA USED TO
DETERMINE ANY STATE PROPERTY TAX RATES INCLUDED IN THE PROPOSAL; AND
(II) MAY:
1. ESTABLISH CLASSES OR SUBCLASSES OF PROPERTY
IN ADDITION TO THE CLASSES ESTABLISHED UNDER § 8–101 OF THE
TAX – PROPERTY ARTICLE;
2. INCLUDE DIFFERENT TAX RATES FOR DIFFERENT
CLASSES OR SUBCLASSES OF PROPERTY; AND
3. ESTABLISH BOUNDARIES, INCLUDING BOUNDARIES
SURROUNDING TRANSPORTATION PROJECTS OR TRANSPORTATION
INFRASTRUCTURE, WITHIN WHICH DIFFERENT TAX RATES MAY BE IMPOSED ON
DIFFERENT CLASSES OR SUBCLASSES OF PROPERTY.
(4) FOR PURPOSES OF DETERMINING THE STATE PROPERTY TAX
RATES FOR THE PROPOSAL UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
GOVERNOR MAY CONSIDER:

HOUSE BILL 641 3
(I) FOR EACH COUNTY, CLASS, SUBCLASS, OR BOUNDED
GEOGRAPHIC AREA FOR WHICH A SEPARATE PROPERTY TAX RATE IS PROPOSED:
1. THE COST TO MAINTAIN EXISTING TRANSPORTATION
INFRASTRUCTURE IN A STATE OF GOOD REPAIR WITHIN THE COUNTY, CLASS,
SUBCLASS, OR BOUNDED GEOGRAPHIC AREA;
2. THE OPERATING COSTS FOR EXISTING
TRANSPORTATION PROGRAMS WITHIN THE COUNTY, CLASS, SUBCLASS, OR
BOUNDED GEOGRAPHIC AREA;
3. THE TRANSPORTATION PROJECTS IN THE
CONSOLIDATED TRANSPORTATION PLAN WITHIN THE COUNTY, CLASS, SUBCLASS,
OR BOUNDED GEOGRAPHIC AREA; AND
4. THE TRANSPORTATION PRIORITIES IDENTIFIED IN
THE COUNTY TRANSPORTATION PRIORITY LETTER FOR THE COUNTY WITHIN WHICH
A CLASS, SUBCLASS, OR BOUNDED GEOGRAPHIC AREA IS LOCATED;
(II) THE POTENTIAL DISPARATE IMPACT OR
DISPROPORTIONATE BURDEN ON PROPERTY OWNERS WITHIN A COUNTY, CLASS,
SUBCLASS, OR BOUNDED GEOGRAPHIC AREA FOR WHICH A SEPARATE PROPERTY
TAX RATE IS PROPOSED; AND
(III) THE POTENTIAL ENVIRONMENTAL OR ECONOMIC BENEFITS
OF A TRANSPORTATION PROJECT PROPOSED TO BE FUNDED IN A COUNTY, CLASS,
SUBCLASS, OR BOUNDED GEOGRAPHIC AREA FOR WHICH A SEPARATE PROPERTY
TAX RATE IS PROPOSED.
(B) (1) ON OR BEFORE FEBRUARY 15 EACH YEAR, THE BOARD OF PUBLIC
WORKS SHALL APPROVE, REJECT, OR MODIFY THE PROPOSED STATE PROPERTY
TAX UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) IF THE BOARD OF PUBLIC WORKS APPROVES OR MODIFIES AND
APPROVES THE STATE PROPERTY TAX UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
THE PROPERTY TAX SHALL BE:
(I) LEVIED IN THE SAME MANNER, ON THE SAME ASSESSMENTS,
FOR THE SAME PERIOD, AND AS OF THE SAME DATE OF FINALITY AS ARE
PRESCRIBED FOR PROPERTY TAX PURPOSES FOR THE STATE; AND


HOUSE BILL 641
(II) COLLECTED AND SECURED IN THE SAME MANNER AS THE
COUNTY PROPERTY TAXES AND SHALL BE SUBJECT TO THE SAME PENALTIES AND
THE SAME PROCEDURE, SALE, AND LIEN PRIORITY IN CASE OF DELINQUENCY AS
PROVIDED FOR THE COUNTY PROPERTY TAXES.
(C) THE ESTIMATED REVENUE FROM THE PROPOSAL UNDER SUBSECTION
(A) OF THIS SECTION AND THE STATE PROPERTY TAX APPROVED OR MODIFIED AND
APPROVED BY THE BOARD OF PUBLIC WORKS UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION MAY NOT:
(1) EXCEED THE ESTIMATED REVENUE ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE RATE
OF STATE TAX CERTIFIED BY THE BOARD OF PUBLIC WORKS UNDER § 8–134 OF
THIS ARTICLE; OR
(2) RESULT IN PROPERTIES IN A SINGLE COUNTY PAYING MORE THAN
25% OF THE ESTIMATED TOTAL ADDITIONAL REVENUE ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE
STATE PROPERTY TAX PROPOSED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION OR
APPROVED OR MODIFIED AND APPROVED BY THE BOARD OF PUBLIC WORKS UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
Article – Tax – Property
6–201.
(a) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this article, the State may impose State
property tax on the assessment of property that is subject to the State property tax.
(2) (I) IN ADDITION TO THE STATE PROPERTY TAX AUTHORIZED
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THERE IS A STATE PROPERTY TAX ON
THE ASSESSMENT OF PROPERTY THAT IS SUBJECT TO THE STATE PROPERTY TAX AT
THE RATES AND ON THE CLASSES OR SUBCLASSES OF PROPERTY THAT THE BOARD
OF PUBLIC WORKS APPROVES UNDER § 7–107.1 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND
PROCUREMENT ARTICLE TO SUPPORT TRANSPORTATION PROJECTS AND
PROGRAMS.
(II) THE COMPTROLLER SHALL DISTRIBUTE THE REVENUE
FROM THE STATE PROPERTY TAX IMPOSED UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH TO THE
TRANSPORTATION TRUST FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 3–216 OF THE
TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE.
6–301.

HOUSE BILL 641 5
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the Board of Public Works
annually shall set the rates for State property tax for the next taxable year as authorized
by the General Assembly.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2026.